en: Rye flours Type 130
fr: Farines de seigle T130, farines complètes de seigle
hr: Raženo brašno tip 130
nl: Roggemelen T130

en: Rye flours Type 1740, Rye flours type 170
de: Roggenmehle Type 1740
fr: Farines de seigle T170, farines intégrales de seigle
hr: Raženo brašno tip 1740
nl: Roggemelen Type 1740

en: Rye flours Type 815
de: Roggenmehle Type 815
fr: Farines de seigle T70, farines blanche de seigle
hr: Raženo brašno tip 815
nl: Roggemelen Type 815

en: Rye flours Type 997, Rye flours type 85
de: Roggenmehle Type 997
fr: Farines de seigle T85, farines bise de seigle, farines semi-complètes de seigle
hr: Raženo brašno tip 997
nl: Roggemelen Type 997

en: Rye flours Type 1150
de: Roggenmehle Type 1150
hr: Raženo brašno tip 1150
nl: Roggemelen Type 1150

en: Rye flours Type 1370
de: Roggenmehle Type 1370
hr: Raženo brašno tip 1370
nl: Roggemelen Type 1370

en: Stone ground flours
bg: Брашно смляно на каменна мелница
es: Harinas molidas a piedra
fr: Farines de meule
hr: Kameno mljeveno brašno
lt: Akmenimis malti miltai
nl: Steengemalen melen

en: Sorghum flours
es: Harinas de sorgo
fr: Farines de sorgho
hr: Brašna od sirka
it: Farine di sorgo, farina di sorgo
lt: Sorgo miltai
nl: Sorghummelen, sorghummeel

en: Teff flours
es: Harinas de teff, Harinas de tef
fr: Farines de teff
hr: Teff brašna
it: Farine di teff
ja: テフ粉
lt: Teff miltai
nl: Teffmelen

en: Wheat flours
bg: Пшенично брашно
de: Weizenmehle
es: Harinas de trigo
fi: vehnäjauhot
fr: Farines de blé
hr: Pšenična brašna
it: Farine di grano
ja: 小麦粉
lt: Kvietiniai miltai
nl: Tarwemelen, Tarwebloem, Tarwemeel
pl: Mąki pszenne, Mąka pszenna
pt: Farinhas de trigo, farinha de trigo
ru: Мука пшеничная, Пшеничная мука
tr: Buğday unu

en: Self-raising wheat flour
bg: Пшенично брашно с набухвател
fr: Farine de blé tendre avec levure incorporée, Farine de froment avec levure incorporée
hr: Samodizajuće pšenično brašno

en: Wheat flour T405, Wheat flour type 45 for pastry
de: Weizenmehle Type 405
fr: Farines de blé type T45, Farines de blé T45, Farines de blé type 45, farines à pâtisserie de blé, fleurs de farine de blé, Farine de blé tendre T45 pour pâtisserie, Farine de froment T45 pour pâtisserie
hr: Pšenično brašno t405
lt: Kvietiniai miltai 405D
nl: Tarwemeel T405

en: Wheat flour type 55 for bread
bg: Бяло пшенично брашно
de: Weizenmehle Type 550
es: Harinas de trigo blancas
fi: valkoiset vehnäjauhot
fr: Farines de blé type T55, Farines de blé T55, Farines de blé type 55, farines blanches de blé, Farine de blé tendre T55 pour pains
hr: Pšenično brašno tip 55 za kruh
lt: Kvietiniai miltai 550D
nl: Witte tarwebloem 550
pl: Mąka pszenna typ 550

en: White common wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo común blancas, Harinas de trigo harinero blancas
fr: Farines de froment T55, Farines de froment T55 pour pains
hr: Bijela obična pšenična brašna
nl: Gewone witte tarwemelen
ro: Faina albă de grâu

en: Semi-polished wheat flours, Wheat flour type 80, Wheat flour T80
es: Harinas de trigo semi-integrales
fr: Farines de blé type T80, Farines de blé T80, Farines de blé type 80, farines bises de blé, farines semi-complète de blé, Farine de blé tendre T80
hr: Polupolirana pšenična brašna
nl: Half-gepolijst tarwemeel

en: Semi-polished common wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo común semi-integrales
fr: Farines de froment T80, Farine de froment T80
hr: Polupolirano brašno od obične pšenice

en: Common wheat flours, Bread wheat flours
es: Harinas de trigo blando, Harinas de trigo común, Harinas de trigo harinero
fr: Farines de froment, Farines de blé tendre
hr: Brašna od obične pšenice
it: Farine di grano tenero
nl: Gewone tarwemelen, Gewoon tarwemeel

en: Wheat flour T45
fr: Farines de froment T45

en: Wheat flour type 65, Wheat flour T65
de: Weizenmehle Type 812
fr: Farines de blé type T65, Farines de blé T65, Farines de blé type 65, farines de tradition française de blé, Farine de blé tendre T65
hr: Pšenično brašno tip 65
nl: Tarwemelen T65

en: Wheat flour type 530, Wheat flour T530
cs: mouky pšeničné hladké